Washington statutes.
RCW 42.60.030

Prohibitions—Law enforcement agencies.

State and local law enforcement agencies shall not:

(1) Collect information on the religious belief, practice, or affiliation of any individual except (a) as part of a criminal investigation of an individual based on reasonable suspicion that the individual has engaged in criminal activity, and when there is a nexus between the criminal activity and the specific information collected about religious belief, practice, or affiliation, or (b) where necessary to provide religious accommodations; or

(2) Use public funds, facilities, property, equipment, or personnel to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any criminal, civil, or administrative violation, or warrant for a violation, of any requirement that individuals register with the federal government or any federal agency based on religion.

[ 2018 c 303 s 4.]